Colorado, session 2026A, HB1042.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 12-270-109.5 as
follows:
12-270-109.5. Dry needling - rules.
(1) ON AND AFTER SEPTEMBER 1, 2027, AN OCCUPATIONAL
THERAPIST MAY PERFORM DRY NEEDLING IF THE OCCUPATIONAL THERAPIST:
(a) HAS THE KNOWLEDGE, SKILL, ABILITY, AND DOCUMENTED
COMPETENCY TO PERFORM THE ACT;
(b) HAS SUCCESSFULLY COMPLETED A DRY NEEDLING COURSE OF
STUDY THAT MEETS THE SUPERVISORIAL, EDUCATIONAL, AND CLINICAL
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

PREREQUISITES ESTABLISHED BY RULE PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS
SECTION; AND
(c) OBTAINS A WRITTEN INFORMED CONSENT FROM EACH PATIENT
FOR DRY NEEDLING, INCLUDING:
(I) INFORMATION CONCERNING THE POTENTIAL BENEFITS AND RISKS
OF DRY NEEDLING; AND
(II) A STATEMENT THAT THE OCCUPATIONAL THERAPIST PERFORMING
DRY NEEDLING IS NOT AN ACUPUNCTURIST.
(2) ON OR BEFORE JUNE 1, 2027, THE DIRECTOR SHALL ADOPT RULES
TO ESTABLISH THE REQUIREMENTS FOR AN OCCUPATIONAL THERAPIST TO
PERFORM DRY NEEDLING IN ORDER TO ENSURE ADEQUATE PROTECTION OF
THE PUBLIC. AT A MINIMUM, THE RULES MUST ESTABLISH REQUIREMENTS
THAT ARE EQUIVALENT TO THE REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED IN RULES
ADOPTED BY THE STATE PHYSICAL THERAPY BOARD PURSUANT TO SECTION
12-285-116 (5)(b) AUTHORIZING A PHYSICAL THERAPIST TO PERFORM DRY
NEEDLING. PRIOR TO ADOPTING THE RULES, THE DIRECTOR SHALL SEEK INPUT
FROM THE COLORADO MEDICAL BOARD CREATED IN SECTION 12-240-105 (1).
(3) NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 12-200-103 (5), THE PERFORMANCE
OF DRY NEEDLING BY AN OCCUPATIONAL THERAPIST IN ACCORDANCE WITH
THIS SECTION IS NOT THE PRACTICE OF ACUPUNCTURE AND IS NOT A
VIOLATION OF SECTION 12-200-108.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1042

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1042